lexd_components/hyw-pronouns.lexd
#many possessors, many objects
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc>:մերինները
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc>:մերիններն # Dir/LR 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><gen_dat>:մերիններուն
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><abl><def>:մերիններէն 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins>:մերիններով 
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերիններովը
մերինը<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերիններովն # Dir/LR 
 
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc>:մերոնք
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc>:մերոնքներ   # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:մերոնքը
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:մերոնքները  # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:մերոնքն # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:մերոնքներն # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><gen_dat><def>:մերոնքին
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><gen_dat><def>:մերոնքներուն  # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><abl><def>:մերոնքէն 
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><abl><def>:մերոնքներէն  # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins>:մերոնքով 
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins>:մերոնքներով # Dir/LR
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերոնքովը
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերոնքներովը # Dir/LR 
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերոնքովն # Dir/LR 
մերոնք<prn><subs><px1pl><pl><ins><def>:մերոնքներովն # Dir/LR 
 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc>:ձերինները
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc>:ձերիններն # Dir/LR 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><gen_dat>:ձերիններուն
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><abl>:ձերիններէն 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins>:ձերիններով 
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերիններովը
ձերինը<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերիններովն # Dir/LR 

ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc>:ձերոնք
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc>:ձերոնքներ   # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:ձերոնքը
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:ձերոնքները  # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:ձերոնքն # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><nom_acc><def>:ձերոնքներն # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><gen_dat><def>:ձերոնքին
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><gen_dat><def>:ձերոնքներուն  # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><abl><def>:ձերոնքէն 
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><abl><def>:ձերոնքներէն  # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins>:ձերոնքով 
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins>:ձերոնքներով # Dir/LR
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերոնքովը
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերոնքներովը # Dir/LR 
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերոնքովն # Dir/LR 
ձերոնք<prn><subs><px2pl><pl><ins><def>:ձերոնքներովն # Dir/LR 

անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><nom_acc>:անոնցները 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><nom_acc>:անոնցներն # Dir/LR 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><gen_dat>:անոնցիններուն
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><abl>:անոնցիններէն 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><ins>:անոնցիններով 
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><ins><def>:անոնցիններովը
անոնցը<prn><subs><px3pl><pl><ins><def>:անոնցիններովն # Dir/LR 

իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><nom_acc>:իրենցները  
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><nom_acc>:իրենցներն # Dir/LR  
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><gen_dat>:իրենցիններուն
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><abl>:իրենցիններէն 
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><ins>:իրենցիններով
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><ins><def>:իրենցիններովը
իրենցը<prn><log><subs><px3pl><pl><ins><def>:իրենցիններովն # Dir/LR 


##############
##############
##############
#### Reflexive and reciprocal Pronoun morphemes
##############
##############


### Based on Hagopian 2007 page 355
LEXICON ReciprocalPronoun
իրար<prn><ref><gen_dat>:իրար # Dir/LR
իրար<prn><ref><gen_dat>:իրարու #to each other
իրար<prn><ref><acc>:զիրար   # Dir/LR   obsolete
իրար<prn><ref><abl>:իրարմէ
իրար<prn><ref><abl>:իրարից # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
իրար<prn><ref><ins>:իրարմով
իրար<prn><ref><ins>:իրարով # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching

#undeclinable
մէկըզմէկ<prn><ref><acc>:մէկըզմէկ
մէկզմէկ<prn><ref><acc>:մէկզմէկ
մեր<prn><ref><acc>:մեր



### She doesn't provide reflexive paradigms, but just reciprocals
LEXICON ReflexivePronoun
ինքզինքը<prn><ref>:ինքզինք
նոյնինքը<prn><ref>:նոյնինք

LEXICON ReflexivePronounInkIr
ինքիր<prn><ref>:ինքիր
ինքնիր<prn><ref>:ինքնիր


LEXICON ReflexivePronounArchaic
#Somewhat archaic
ինքս<prn><ref><px1sg>:ինքս
ինքս<prn><ref><px2sg>:ինքդ


##############
##############
##############
#### Demonstrative Pronoun morphemes
##############
##############


### Based on Hagopian 2007 page 355


LEXICON DemonstrativePronounDeterminer
# I repeat lines from Dem to Det
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:այս  # this
այս<det><prx>:այս 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:սոյն  # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:ասի   # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:ասիկա   # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:աս   # Dir/LR 
այս<det><prx>:աս   # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><nom_acc>:սա  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
այս<det><prx>:սա  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><gen_dat>:ասոր   
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><gen_dat>:սորա # Dir/LR
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><gen_dat>:սրա # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><gen_dat>:սրան # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><acc>:զայս # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><abl>:ասկէ
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><abl>:այսկէ # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><abl>:ասորմէ # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><abl>:սրանից # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><ins>:ասով
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><ins>:այսով # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><ins>:ասորմով # Dir/LR 
այս<prn><dem><prx><sg><ins>:սրանով # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><nom_acc>:ասոնք  # these
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><nom_acc>:սրանք   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><gen_dat>:ասոնց
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><gen_dat>:սոցա # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><gen_dat>:սրանց   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><abl>:ասոնցմէ
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><abl>:սրանցից   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><ins>:ասոնցմով
ասոնք<prn><dem><prx><pl><ins>:սրանցով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:այդ  # that medial
այդ<det><med>:այդ  # that medial
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:ատիկա   # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:ադ   # Dir/LR 
այդ<det><med>:ադ   # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:ատ   # Dir/LR 
այդ<det><med>:ատ   # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:ատի   # Dir/LR
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:դոյն   # Dir/LR
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><nom_acc>:դա   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այդ<det><med>:դա   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><gen_dat>:ատոր   
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><gen_dat>:դրա   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><gen_dat>:դրան   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><acc>:զայդ # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><abl>:ատկէ
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><abl>:այդկէ # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><abl>:ատորմէ # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><abl>:դրանից   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><ins>:ատով
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><ins>:այդով # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><ins>:ատորմով # Dir/LR 
այդ<prn><dem><med><sg><ins>:դրանով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><nom_acc>:ատոնք  # those
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><nom_acc>:դրանք   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><gen_dat>:ատոնց
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><gen_dat>:դրանց   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><abl>:ատոնցմէ
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><abl>:դրանցիս   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><ins>:ատոնցմով
ատոնք<prn><dem><med><pl><ins>:դրանցով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><nom_acc>:այն  # that yonder
այն<det><dst>:այն  # that yonder
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><nom_acc>:անիկա   # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><nom_acc>:ան   # Dir/LR 
այն<det><dst>:ան  # that yonder
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><nom_acc>:անի  # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><nom_acc>:նա     # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այն<det><dst>:նա     # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><gen_dat>:անոր   
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><gen_dat>:նրա   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><gen_dat>:նրան   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><acc>:զանիկա # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><acc>:զայն # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:անկէ
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:այնկէ # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:անկէց # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:անկից # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:անորմէ # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><abl>:նրանից   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><ins>:անով
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><ins>:այնով # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><ins>:անորմով # Dir/LR 
այն<prn><dem><dst><sg><ins>:նրանով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><nom_acc>:անոնք  # these
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><nom_acc>:նոքս    # Dir/LR
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><nom_acc>:նոքա    # Dir/LR
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><nom_acc>:նրանք    # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><gen_dat>:անոնց
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><gen_dat>:նոցա    # Dir/LR
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><gen_dat>:նրանց    # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><acc>:զանոնք # Dir/LR 
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><acc>:զանոնց # Dir/LR 
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><abl>:անոնցմէ
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><abl>:նրանցից    # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><ins>:անոնցմով
անոնք<prn><dem><dst><pl><ins>:նրանցով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

##############
##############
##############
#### Relative Pronoun and Interrogative morphemes
##############
##############



### Based on Hagopian 2007 page 355
#I just get the outputs here. The input is in the pattern so that i can do a disjunction 
# of relative pronoun and interrogative pronoun tagging

LEXICON RelativePronounThatInflected
<sg><nom_acc>:որ # that
<sg><nom_acc><def>:որը # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><nom_acc><def>:որն # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><gen_dat>:որու
<sg><gen_dat>:որի  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><acc>:զոր # Dir/LR 
<sg><abl>:որմէ
<sg><abl>:որից   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><ins>:որմով 
<sg><ins>:որով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

<pl><nom_acc>:որոնք
<pl><nom_acc>:ոմանք # Dir/LR
<pl><gen_dat>:որոնց
<pl><acc>:զորոնք # Dir/LR 
<pl><acc>:որս # Dir/LR 
<pl><acc>:զորս # Dir/LR 
<pl><acc>:ոմանց # Dir/LR
<pl><abl>:որոնցմէ
<pl><abl>:ոմանցմէ # Dir/LR
<pl><abl>:ոմանցից  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<pl><ins>:որոնցով # Dir/LR 
<pl><ins>:որոնցմով 
<pl><ins>:ոմանցմով # Dir/LR
<pl><ins>:ոմանցով  # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

LEXICON RelativePronounWhoInflected
<sg><nom_acc>:ով # who
<sg><acc>:զով # Dir/LR 
<sg><acc>:ում   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><gen_dat>:ում   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><abl>:ումից   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   
<sg><ins>:ումով   # Dir/LR  Eastern code-switching   

<pl><nom_acc>:ովքեր 
<sg><gen_dat>:ովքերու  
<sg><abl>:ովքերէ  
<sg><ins>:ովքերով   

LEXICON RelativePronounWhereInflected
ուր<prn><rel><sg><nom_acc>:ուր # where
ուր<prn><rel><sg><abl>:ուրկէ
ուր<prn><rel><sg><abl>:ուրկից # Dir/LR ea

#I push երբ when into the noun-paradigm because it takes a lot of nominal inflection
#երբ<prn><rel><sg><nom_acc>:երբ # when
#երբ<prn><rel><sg><gen_dat>:երբուան
#երբ<prn><rel><sg><abl>:երբուընէ


LEXICON Quantifier
այլ:այլ
ամէնք:ամէնք
բոլոր:բոլոր
ամէնայն:ամէնայն
իւրաքանչիւր:իւրաքանչիւր
նոյնչափ:նոյնչափ
նոյնքան:նոյնքան
այդչափ:այդչափ
այնչափ:այնչափ
այսչափ:այսչափ
ադչափ:ադչափ
անչափ:անչափ
ասչափ:ասչափ
ցորչափ:ցորչափ
ցորքան:ցորքան
այդքան:այդքան
այնքան:այնքան
այսքան:այսքան
ադքան:ադքան
անքան:անքան
ասքան:ասքան
քանի:քանի #reassigned had ՞
աւելի:աւելի #reassigned
նուազ:նուազ #reassigned

LEXICON QuantifierU
ամէն:ամէն
ամեն:ամեն
